Oklahoma, session 2026, SB185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3234 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma


Department of Transportation Educational Assistance Act”.


B. As used in this act:


1. “Commission” means the Transportation Commission;


2. “Department” means the Department of Transportation;


3. “Eligible degree” means a baccalaureate degree from an


Oklahoma educational institution in a field of study that satisfies


the Department’s minimum education requirements for an eligible


profession;


4. “Eligible profession” means an engineer, a land surveyor, or


an accountant;


5. “Eligible student” means a student who has a high school


diploma or who has completed General Educational Development (GED)


requirements and who:


a. has completed and filed with the Department, on forms


prescribed by the Department, an application and a

Req. No. 931 Page 2


declaration of intent to become a member of an


eligible profession and work for the Department for


five (5) years immediately following the date of the


student’s receipt of an eligible degree,


b. has enrolled in an Oklahoma educational institution,


c. is an Oklahoma resident, and


d. is age eighteen (18) or older;


6. “Graduate program” means a program offered by an Oklahoma


educational institution that leads to the award of a master’s degree


or higher;


7. “Oklahoma educational institution” means an institution of


higher education within The Oklahoma State System of Higher


Education;


8. “Program” means the Oklahoma Department of Transportation


Educational Assistance Program; and


9. “Undergraduate program” means a program offered by an


Oklahoma educational institution that leads to the award of a


baccalaureate degree.


C. There is hereby created the Oklahoma Department of


Transportation Educational Assistance Program to provide assistance


to eligible students who enroll in an Oklahoma educational


institution and who agree to work for the Department in an eligible


profession for the five (5) years immediately following the date of


the student’s receipt of an eligible degree. The Commission shall

Req. No. 931 Page 3


promulgate rules prescribing the criteria for the selection of


applicants pursuant to this act. Subject to the availability of


funding, the amount of assistance shall be equivalent to the amount


of resident tuition, mandatory fees, and academic service fees for


courses in which the eligible student is enrolled, not to exceed a


maximum of eighteen (18) credit hours each semester.


1. The amount of assistance provided to an eligible student


enrolled in an undergraduate program shall not exceed the number of


hours required for completion of an undergraduate program in pursuit


of a baccalaureate degree.


2. Subject to the assistance for eligible students enrolled in


undergraduate programs being fully funded, assistance shall be


provided to an eligible student with a baccalaureate degree enrolled


in a graduate program. The amount of assistance provided to an


eligible student enrolled in a graduate program shall not exceed the


number of hours required for completion of a master’s degree.


3. Assistance provided pursuant to this act shall be granted


without any limitation other than the amount of funds available for


the program and the number of eligible students who apply.


4. Assistance allowed by this act shall not be allowed for


courses taken in excess of the requirements for completion of an


undergraduate program or a graduate program, whichever is applicable


for the eligible student.



Req. No. 931 Page 4


5. Assistance allowed by this act shall not be allowed for


courses in which the eligible student earns a failing grade.


D. 1. To retain eligibility for the program, an eligible


student shall:


a. maintain good academic standing and satisfactory


academic progress according to standards of the


Oklahoma educational institution in which the eligible


student is enrolled,


b. maintain the requirements for retention and degree


completion as established by the Oklahoma educational


institution in which the eligible student is enrolled,


and


c. maintain a minimum grade point average of 2.0 on a 4.0


scale.


2. An eligible student seeking assistance pursuant to the


provisions of this act shall submit an application on a form


prescribed by the Department prior to the semester for which


assistance is sought.


3. An eligible student may be denied continued assistance if he


or she fails to comply with the provisions of this act.


E. 1. The Commission shall promulgate rules establishing


conditions under which an eligible student who has received


assistance pursuant to this act may be required to repay all or part


of the assistance because the eligible student has withdrawn from

Req. No. 931 Page 5


the Oklahoma educational institution or has failed to meet the


requirements of paragraph 1 of subsection D of this section.


2. An eligible student who does not become a member of an


eligible profession and work for the Department for the five (5)


years immediately following the date of the student’s receipt of an


eligible degree shall repay all assistance received by the eligible


student.


3. Repayments shall be deposited into the Oklahoma Department


of Transportation Educational Assistance Revolving Fund created


pursuant to Section 2 of this act.


4. The Commission shall establish a schedule for installment


repayments under this act.


5. An eligible student who has received program assistance


pursuant to the provisions of this act and who fails to comply with


the provisions of this act due to hardship circumstances may request


a waiver from repayment. A waiver request shall be submitted in


writing to the Director of the Department of Transportation.


F. The Department may accept gifts and grants from any public


or private source for the program and may also use any state funds


that have been specifically appropriated or apportioned for the


program created pursuant to this act. All funding received by the


Department for this purpose shall be transferred to the Oklahoma


Department of Transportation Educational Assistance Revolving Fund


created pursuant to Section 2 of this act.

Req. No. 931 Page 6


G. The Commission shall promulgate rules to implement the


provisions of this act.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3235 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund


to be designated the “Oklahoma Department of Transportation


Educational Assistance Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a


continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall


consist of monies received by the Department of Transportation


pursuant to paragraph 3 of subsection E of Section 1 of this act and


subsection F of Section 1 of this act provided for the purpose of


funding the Oklahoma Department of Transportation Educational


Assistance Program. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund


are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the


Department of Transportation for the purpose provided for in this


section. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants


issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by


law with the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services for approval and payment.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby



Req. No. 931 Page 7


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-931 EB 12/30/2024 1:47:15 PM









































Req. No. 931 Page 8